Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 16

Special County Census for Allocation of Funds

9-16-101. Special census by counties.

For purposes of determining its eligibility in whole or part for an allocation of tax proceeds or other funds, each county may take not more than two (2) special censuses at its own expense at any time during the interim between the regular decennial federal censuses. The special census shall be taken by the federal census bureau or in a manner directed by and satisfactory to the department of economic and community development. The population of the county shall thereafter be revised in accordance with the special census, effective on July 1 following certification of the census results by the federal census bureau or department of economic and community development to the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1978, ch. 806, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-1701; Acts 1995, ch. 501, § 7.

Cross-References. Special census by municipality for distribution of municipal street aid funds, §54-4-203.

Special census by municipality for distribution of sales tax, §67-6-103.

Special census by municipality for distribution of state privilege tax, §57-5-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Census, § 1.